Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 9. Dissolution.

Collateral references. —

Relief other than dissolution in cases of intracorporate deadlock or dissension. 34 ALR4th 13.

Sec. 10.06.605.
Voluntary dissolution by vote or written consent of shares, or by approval of the board.

A corporation may elect voluntarily to wind up and dissolve by

the vote of shareholders taken at a special or annual meeting with notice under AS

10.06.410

to each shareholder entitled to vote at the meeting and stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider approval of voluntary dissolution of the corporation; at the meeting the election to voluntarily dissolve is adopted upon receiving the affirmative votes of two-thirds or more of the shares of the corporation entitled to vote, unless any class of shares is entitled to vote as a class, in which case the election is adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote of two-thirds or more of the shares of each class entitled to vote as a class and of two-thirds or more of the shares entitled to vote; or

written consent of the shares taken without a meeting under AS

10.06.423

.

A corporation may elect by approval of the board to wind up and dissolve if the corporation has

been adjudicated bankrupt;

disposed of all of its assets and has not conducted any business for a period of five years immediately preceding the adoption of the resolution to dissolve the corporation; or

issued no shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 47 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.608.
Certificate of election: contents, signing, and filing.

A corporation that has elected to wind up and dissolve shall immediately file a certificate evidencing the election as provided in this section.

The certificate must be an officers’ certificate or shall be signed by at least a majority of the directors then in office, by one or more shareholders authorized to do so by the shareholders holding shares representing 50 percent or more of the voting power, or by the officer or shareholder designated in the written consent and must set out

the name of the corporation, the names and addresses of its officers under AS

10.06.483

, the names and addresses of its directors, and the statement that the corporation has elected to wind up and dissolve;

the number of shares voting for the election if the election was made by the vote of shareholders and a statement that the election was made by shareholders representing at least two-thirds of the voting power under AS

10.06.605(a)(1)

;

a copy of the written consent signed by all shareholders of the corporation if the election was made by the written consent of the shares;

circumstances showing the corporation to be within one of the categories described in AS

10.06.605(b)

if the election was made by the board under that subsection.

An original and an exact copy of the certificate conforming to (b) of this section shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Due to a typographical manifest error, the amendment made by § 13, ch. 65, SLA 1998 to (b) of this section indicated that it was made to
AS 10.06.068(b).

Sec. 10.06.610.
Revocation of election; contents, signing, and filing of certificate.

A voluntary election to wind up and dissolve under AS

10.06.605

may be revoked before distribution of assets by an election to revoke made in the same manner as an election under AS

10.06.605

. A certificate evidencing the election to revoke shall be signed and filed in the manner prescribed in AS

10.06.608

.

The certificate must set out

that the corporation has revoked its election to wind up and dissolve;

that no assets have been distributed as a result of the election;

the number of shares voting for the revocation and the total number of outstanding shares the holders of which were entitled to vote on the revocation, if the election to revoke was made by the vote of shareholders;

a copy of the written consent signed by all shareholders of the corporation if the election to revoke was made by the written consent of the shares;

the resolution of the board if the election to revoke was made by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 14 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.613.
Effective date of revocation and effect of revocation.

Revocation of a voluntary dissolution proceeding is effective upon compliance with AS

10.06.610

and the corporation may again carry on its business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.615.
Commencement and conduct of voluntary proceedings for winding up; cessation of business; notice.

Voluntary proceedings for winding up the corporation commence upon the resolution of shareholders or directors of the corporation electing to wind up and dissolve, or upon the filing with the corporation of a written consent of the shareholders.

If a voluntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the board shall continue to act as a board and has powers as provided in (c) of this section to wind up and settle its affairs, both before and after the filing of the certificate of dissolution.

If a voluntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the corporation shall cease to carry on business except to the extent necessary for the beneficial winding up of its business and except during the period the board considers necessary to preserve the corporation’s goodwill or going-concern value pending a sale of its business or assets, in whole or in part. The board shall give written notice of the commencement of the proceeding for voluntary winding up by mail to all shareholders and all known creditors and claimants whose addresses appear on the records of the corporation. It is unnecessary to give notice to shareholders who voted in favor of winding up and dissolving the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.618.
Judicial supervision of voluntary winding up; petition and notice; orders protecting shareholders and creditors.

If a corporation is in the process of voluntary winding up, a court, upon the petition of the corporation, a five-percent shareholder, or three or more creditors, and upon notice to the corporation and to other persons interested in the corporation as shareholders and creditors as the court may order, may take jurisdiction over the voluntary winding-up proceeding if it appears necessary for the protection of any parties in interest. The court, if it assumes jurisdiction, may make orders as to any and all matters concerning the winding up of the affairs of the corporation and for the protection of its shareholders and creditors of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.620.
Articles of dissolution: contents.

If a corporation has been completely wound up without court proceedings, a majority of the directors then in office shall sign articles of dissolution stating that

the corporation has been completely wound up;

its known debts and liabilities have been actually paid, or adequately provided for under AS

10.06.668

, or paid or adequately provided for as far as the assets of the corporation permit, or that it has incurred no known debts or liabilities; if there are known debts or liabilities for which adequate provision for payment has been made, the articles of dissolution must state what provision has been made, setting out the name and address of the corporation, person, or governmental agency that has assumed or guaranteed payment, or the name and address of the depositary with which deposit has been made and such other information as may be necessary to enable the creditor or other person to whom payment is to be made to appear and claim payment of the debt or liability;

its known assets have been distributed to shareholders, or, if there are no shareholders, to persons entitled to the assets, or wholly applied or deposited on account of its debts and liabilities, or that it acquired no known assets;

the corporation is dissolved.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 15 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.623.
Filing of articles of dissolution.

An original and an exact copy of the articles of dissolution shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

and for issuance of a certificate of dissolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.625.
Effect of certificate of dissolution.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of dissolution, the existence of the corporation ceases, except for the purpose of suits, other proceedings, and appropriate corporate action by shareholders, directors, and officers as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.628.
Involuntary dissolution by verified complaint; filing; intervention by shareholder or creditor.

A verified complaint for involuntary dissolution of a corporation on any of the grounds specified in (b) of this section may be filed in the superior court by the following persons:

one-half or more of the directors in office;

a shareholder or shareholders who hold shares representing not less than 331/3 percent of the total number of outstanding shares, assuming conversion of preferred shares convertible into common shares, or of the outstanding common shares, or of the equity of the corporation, exclusive of shares owned by persons who have personally participated in any of the transactions enumerated in (b)(4) of this section;

a shareholder if the ground for dissolution is that the period for which the corporation was formed has terminated without extension; or

another person expressly authorized to do so in the articles.

The grounds for involuntary dissolution are:

the corporation has abandoned its business for more than one year;

the corporation has an even number of directors who are equally divided and cannot agree as to the management of its affairs, so that its business can no longer be conducted to advantage or so that there is danger that its property and business will be impaired or lost, and the holders of the voting shares of the corporation are so divided into factions that they cannot elect a board consisting of an uneven number;

there is internal dissension and two or more factions of shareholders in the corporation are so deadlocked that its business can no longer be conducted with advantage to its shareholders, or the shareholders have failed at two consecutive annual meetings at which all voting power was exercised to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon election of their successors;

those in control of the corporation have been guilty of or have knowingly countenanced persistent and pervasive fraud, mismanagement or abuse of authority or persistent unfairness toward shareholders, or the property of the corporation is being misapplied or wasted by its directors or officers;

in the case of any corporation with 35 or fewer shareholders of record, liquidation is reasonably necessary for the protection of the rights or interests of the complaining shareholder or shareholders; or

the period for which the corporation was formed has terminated without extension.

Before the trial of the action a shareholder or creditor of the corporation may intervene.

For purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner of shares who has entered into an agreement under AS

10.06.425(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 48 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure 11 and 24, see secs. 23 and 24, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.630.
Avoiding dissolution by verified complaint; purchase of plaintiff’s shares; determination of fair value; stay; appraisal; award; appeal.

Subject to a contrary provision in the articles of incorporation, in a suit for involuntary dissolution under AS

10.06.628

the corporation or, if it does not elect to purchase, the holders of 50 percent or more of the voting power of the corporation, the “purchasing parties”, may avoid the dissolution of the corporation and the appointment of a receiver by purchasing for cash the shares owned by the plaintiffs, the “moving parties”, at their fair value. The fair value shall be determined on the basis of the liquidation value, taking into account the possibility of sale of the entire business as a going concern in a liquidation. The election of the corporation to purchase may be made by the approval of the outstanding shares excluding shares held by the moving parties.

If the purchasing parties elect to purchase the shares owned by the moving parties, and are unable to agree with the moving parties upon the fair value of the shares, and give bond with sufficient security to pay the estimated reasonable expenses, including attorney fees, of the moving parties if the expenses are recoverable under (c) of this section, the court upon application of the purchasing parties shall stay the winding up and dissolution proceeding and shall proceed to ascertain and fix the fair value of the shares owned by the moving parties.

The court shall appoint three disinterested appraisers to appraise the fair value of the shares owned by the moving parties, and shall make an order referring the matter to the appraisers for the purpose of ascertaining the value of the shares. The order shall prescribe the time and manner of producing evidence if evidence is required. The award of the appraisers or of a majority of the appraisers, when confirmed by the court, is final and conclusive upon all parties. The court shall enter a decree that provides in the alternative for winding up and dissolution of the corporation unless payment is made for the shares within the time specified by the decree. If the purchasing parties do not make payment for the shares within the time specified, judgment shall be entered against the purchasing parties and the surety or sureties on the bond for the amount of the expenses, including attorney fees, of the moving parties. A shareholder aggrieved by the action of the court may appeal.

If the purchasing parties desire to prevent the winding up and dissolution, they shall pay to the moving parties the value of their shares as provided under this section less an allowance for the costs of the appraisal as the court shall determine. In the case of an appeal, the purchasing parties shall pay to the moving parties the value of the shares and costs of appraisal as fixed on appeal. On receiving payment or the tender of payment as determined by the court, the moving parties shall transfer their shares to the purchasing parties.

For the purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner of shares who has entered into an agreement under AS

10.06.425(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 49 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 65, see sec. 25, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.633.
Involuntary dissolution by the commissioner: grounds, procedure, reinstatement.

A corporation may be dissolved involuntarily by the commissioner if

the corporation is delinquent six months in filing its biennial report or in paying its biennial corporation tax or a penalty;

the corporation has failed for 30 days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in the state;

the corporation has failed for 30 days after change of its registered office or registered agent to file in the office of the commissioner a statement of the change;

the corporation has failed for two years to complete dissolution under a certificate of election under AS

10.06.608

to dissolve;

a vacancy on the board of the corporation is not filled within six months or the next annual meeting, whichever occurs first;

a misrepresentation of material facts has been made in the application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted under this chapter; or

the corporation is 90 days delinquent in filing notice of change of an officer, director, alien affiliate, or five percent shareholder, as required by this chapter.

A corporation may not be dissolved under this section unless the commissioner has given the corporation written notice of its delinquency, failure, or noncompliance by mail as provided by (i) of this section. If the corporation fails, within 60 days after the requirements of (i) of this section have been satisfied, to contest the alleged neglect, omission, delinquency, or noncompliance by a written request for a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) or fails to correct the asserted neglect, omission, delinquency, or noncompliance, it may be dissolved under (d) of this section.

If, following a hearing, the commissioner determines the presence of neglect, omission, delinquency, or noncompliance providing grounds for involuntary dissolution under this section, the corporation may appeal to the superior court by filing with the clerk of the court a notice of appeal setting out a copy of the notice given by the commissioner under (b) of this section together with a copy of a timely demand for a hearing by the corporation, and a copy of an affirmation by the commissioner of an intention to dissolve under (d) of this section. The matter shall be tried de novo by the superior court, and the court shall either sustain the commissioner or direct the commissioner to take action the court considers proper.

If a corporation has given cause for involuntary dissolution and has failed to correct the neglect, omission, delinquency, or noncompliance as provided in this section, and there has been no order of the superior court, the commissioner shall dissolve the corporation by issuing a certificate of involuntary dissolution containing a statement that the corporation has been dissolved, the date, and the reason for which it was dissolved. The original certificate of dissolution shall be placed in the department files and a copy of it mailed to the corporation as provided by (i) of this section. Upon the issuance of the certificate of involuntary dissolution, the existence of the corporation ceases, except as otherwise provided in this section, and its name shall be available to and may be adopted by another corporation no less than six months after the dissolution.

A corporation dissolved under this section may be reinstated within two years from the date of the certificate of involuntary dissolution if it is established to the satisfaction of the commissioner that in fact there was no cause for the dissolution, or if the neglect, omission, delinquency, or noncompliance resulting in dissolution has been corrected and payment made of double the amount delinquent along with the amount the corporation would have paid had it not been dissolved during the two-year period. Reinstatement may not be authorized if the name is not available for corporate use under AS

10.06.105(d)

unless the corporation being reinstated amends its articles of incorporation to change its name to conform with the provisions of this chapter.

Nothing in this section relieves a corporation reinstated under this section from penalty or forfeiture of its powers in a case of failure to pay subsequently accruing licenses and taxes imposed by a law of the state.

An action arising out of a contract assigned by a corporation dissolved under this section may be brought in the name of the assignee. The fact of assignment and of purchase by the plaintiff shall be set out in the complaint or other process. The defense may avail itself of any defense the defense might have availed itself of in a suit upon the claim by the corporation had it not been dissolved under this section.

Service of process on a corporation dissolved under this section shall be made in the same manner prescribed by law as if the corporation had not been dissolved.

If the mailing of an item is required by (b) or (d) of this section, the commissioner shall first mail the item by certified mail to the corporation’s registered office at the last known address of the registered office shown on the records of the commissioner. If the item mailed to the registered office is returned to the commissioner, the commissioner shall mail the item by first class mail to the registered agent of the corporation at the last known address of the registered agent shown on the records of the commissioner. If the item mailed to the registered agent is returned to the commissioner, the commissioner shall mail the item by first class mail to the president of the corporation at the last known address for the president shown on the records of the commissioner. If the name and address of the president are not shown on the records of the commissioner, the commissioner shall mail the item by first class mail to an officer shown on the records of the commissioner at the last known address shown on the records of the commissioner. If the name and address of an officer of the corporation are not shown on the records of the commissioner, the commissioner shall mail the item by first class mail to a member of the board of directors of the corporation at the last known address shown on the records of the commissioner. If the name and address of an officer or board member are not shown on the records of the commissioner, the commissioner is not required to mail the item again. If the item mailed to the president, other officer, or board member is returned to the commissioner, the commissioner is not required to mail the item again. If the address shown on the records of the commissioner for a mailing after the initial certified mailing is not different from the address for the previous mailing, the commissioner is not required to mail the item to the same address, but shall mail the item to the next required addressee whose address is different from the address for the returned mailing, and, if none of the mailings required after a returned mailing has an address that is different from the address for the returned mailing, the commissioner is not required to mail the item again. In this subsection, “item” means the notice required by (b) of this section or the certificate of involuntary dissolution under (d) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 50 ch 82 SLA 1989; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 45 SLA 1999; am § 8 ch 50 SLA 1999; am § 25 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure 204 and 609, see secs. 26 and 27, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.635.
Commissioner’s authority to bring action for involuntary dissolution; grounds; relief.

In addition to other remedies provided by law, a corporation may be dissolved involuntarily by a decree of the superior court in an action filed by the commissioner when it is established that the corporation has

procured its certificate of incorporation through fraud;

continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

seriously violated a statute regulating corporations; or

violated a provision of law by an act or default that under the law is a ground for forfeiture of corporate existence.

The court may order dissolution or other or partial relief as it considers just and expedient. The court also may appoint a receiver under AS

10.06.643

for winding up the affairs of the corporation or may order that the corporation be wound up by its board subject to the supervision of the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.638.
Commencement of commissioner’s action; notice; default.

An action for the involuntary dissolution of a corporation under AS

10.06.635

shall be commenced by the commissioner in the superior court.

Summons shall issue and be served as in civil actions. If no registered agent or office is found to serve, the commissioner shall publish notice as in civil cases in a newspaper published in the judicial district where the registered office of the corporation is situated, containing a notice of the pendency of the action, the title of the court, the title of the action, and the date on or after which default may be entered. The commissioner may include in one notice the names of any number of corporations against which actions are pending in the same court.

The commissioner shall mail a copy of the notice to an office of the corporation, if one is known, within 10 days after the first publication of the notice.

Notice shall be published at least once each week for two successive weeks, and the first publication may begin after the summons has been returned.

Unless a corporation is served with summons, a default may not be taken against the corporation earlier than 30 days after the first publication of notice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to AS

10.06.635

was substituted for a reference to AS

10.06.633

in (a) of this section in 1989 to correct a manifest error in ch.166, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 4, see sec. 28, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.640.
Appointment of provisional director upon deadlock.

If the ground for the complaint for involuntary dissolution of the corporation is a deadlock in the board as set out in AS

10.06.628(b)(2)

, the court may appoint a provisional director.

A provisional director shall be an impartial person, who is neither a shareholder nor a creditor of the corporation, nor related according to the common law by consanguinity or affinity within the third degree to a director of the corporation or to a judge of the court by which the provisional director is appointed. A provisional director has all the rights and powers of a director until the deadlock in the board is broken or until the provisional director is removed by order of the court or by approval of the outstanding shares.

Unless otherwise agreed the compensation of the provisional director shall be fixed by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.643.
Appointment of receiver: application, hearing and notice, security, qualifications, powers, compensation.

If, at the time of the filing of a complaint for involuntary dissolution under AS

10.06.628

or at any time after the filing, the court has reasonable grounds to believe that unless a receiver of the corporation is appointed the interests of the corporation and its shareholders will suffer pending the hearing and determination of the complaint, upon the application of the plaintiff and after a hearing upon notice to the corporation as the court may direct, the court may appoint a receiver to take over and manage the business and affairs of the corporation and to preserve its property pending the hearing and determination of the complaint for dissolution.

A receiver shall be a citizen of the United States or a corporation authorized to act as receiver. A corporate receiver may be a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state. A receiver shall give bond and provide sureties as the court may require.

The compensation of the receiver shall be paid out of the assets of the corporation and unless otherwise agreed shall be fixed by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.645.
Decree for winding up and dissolution; further judicial relief.

After hearing, the court may decree a winding up and dissolution of the corporation as provided in AS

10.06.625

or, with or without winding up and dissolution, may make orders and decrees and issue injunctions in the case as justice and equity may require.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.648.
Commencement and conduct of involuntary proceedings for winding up; cessation of business; notice.

Involuntary proceedings for winding up commence when an order for winding up is entered under AS

10.06.635(b)

or

10.06.645

.

If an involuntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the board shall conduct the winding up of the affairs of the corporation, subject to the supervision of the court, unless other persons are appointed by the court to conduct the winding up. The directors or other persons may, subject to any restrictions imposed by the court, exercise all their powers through the executive officers of the corporation without an order of the court.

If an involuntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the corporation shall cease to carry on business except to the extent necessary for the beneficial winding up of the business and except during a period the board may consider necessary to preserve the corporation’s goodwill or going-concern value pending a sale of its business or assets, in whole or in part. The directors shall mail written notice of the commencement of the proceeding for involuntary winding up to all shareholders and to all known creditors and claimants whose addresses appear on the records of the corporation, unless the order for winding up has been stayed by appeal or otherwise or the proceeding or the execution of the order has been enjoined.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.650.
Jurisdiction of court.

If an involuntary proceeding for winding up has been commenced, the jurisdiction of the court includes

the determination of the validity of all claims and demands against the corporation, whether due or not yet due, contingent, unliquidated, or sounding only in damages, and the barring from participation of creditors and claimants failing to make and present claims and proof as required by an order;

the determination or compromise of all claims against the corporation or any of its property, and the determination of the amount of money or assets required to be retained to pay or provide for the payment of claims;

the determination of the rights of shareholders in and to the assets of the corporation;

the supervision of the presentation and filing of intermediate and final accounts of the directors or other persons appointed to conduct the winding up and hearing thereon, the allowance, disallowance, or settlement of the accounts, and the discharge of the directors or the other persons from their duties and liabilities;

the appointment of a master to hear and determine any or all matters, with the power or authority the court considers proper;

the filling of vacancies on the board that the directors or shareholders are unable to fill;

the removal of a director if it appears that the director has been guilty of dishonesty, misconduct, neglect, or abuse of trust in conducting the winding up or if the director is unable to act; the court may order an election to fill the vacancy, and may enjoin, for the time it considers proper, the reelection of the removed director; the court, in place of ordering an election, may appoint a director to fill the vacancy caused by the removal; a director appointed by the court serves until the next annual meeting of shareholders or until a successor is elected or appointed;

staying the prosecution of a suit, proceeding, or action against the corporation and requiring the parties to present and prove their claims in the manner required of other creditors;

the determination of whether adequate provision has been made for payment or satisfaction of all debts and liabilities not actually paid;

the making of orders for the withdrawal or termination of proceedings to wind up and dissolve, subject to conditions for the protection of shareholders and creditors;

the making of an order, after the allowance or settlement of the final accounts of the directors or other persons, that the corporation is legally wound up and is dissolved;

the making of orders for the bringing in of new parties as the court considers proper.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.653.
Claims against corporation; court and non-court directed winding up; presentation; notice; payment; secured claims; rejected claims.

In a court-directed winding up of a corporation under AS

10.06.618

,

10.06.628

,

10.06.635

, and

10.06.645

, creditors and claimants may be barred from participation in a distribution of the general assets of the corporation if they fail to make and present claims and proofs within the time the court may order. The time in which to present claims may not be less than four nor more than six months after the first publication of notice to creditors unless it appears by affidavit that there are no claims, in which case the time may not be less than three months. If it is shown that a claimant did not receive notice because of absence from the state or other cause, the court may allow a claim to be filed or presented at any time before distribution is completed.

Notice to creditors in a court-directed winding up shall be published not less than once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the judicial district in which the proceeding is pending or, if a newspaper is not published in that judicial district, in a newspaper designated by the court. The notice shall direct creditors and claimants to make claims and proofs to the person, at the place, and within the time specified in the notice. A copy of the notice shall be mailed to the last known address of each person shown as a creditor or claimant on the books of the corporation.

A holder of a secured claim in a court-directed winding up may prove for the whole debt in order to secure payment of a deficiency. If a holder fails to present a claim, the holder is barred only as to any right against the general assets for a deficiency in the amount realized on the holder’s security.

Before a distribution in a court-directed winding up is made, the amount of an unmatured, contingent, or disputed claim against the corporation that has been presented and has not been disallowed, or the part of a claim to which the holder would be entitled if the claim were due, established, or absolute, shall, if presently reduced to cash, be paid to the commissioner of revenue. The amount shall be paid to the party entitled to the amount when the party becomes entitled or, if the party fails to establish a claim, the amount shall be distributed with the other assets of the corporation; the court may make other provision for payment of a claim, as it considers adequate. A creditor who has a claim that has been allowed but is not yet due is entitled to the present value of the claim upon distribution.

Assets of the corporation subject to claims under this section and not reduced to cash shall be held pending distribution as creditors and claimants agree or as the court directs.

If the ownership of shares of stock is in dispute, if the existence of a claim of a creditor or shareholder is contingent or contested, or if the amount of a claim of a creditor or shareholder is contingent, contested, or not determined, the maximum amount of the claims shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the commissioner of revenue. Amounts deposited with the commissioner of revenue under this subsection shall be paid to the creditor, shareholder, or the legal representative of the shareholder or creditor as the disputing parties may agree or a court may direct.

Suits against the corporation on claims that have been rejected under (d) or (f) of this section shall be commenced within 30 days after written notice of rejection is given to the claimant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.655.
Order declaring corporation wound up and dissolved; declarations; effect; additional orders; discharge of directors and other persons.

Upon the final settlement of the accounts of the directors or other persons appointed under AS

10.06.648

and the determination that the corporation’s affairs are in a condition for it to be dissolved, the court shall make an order declaring the corporation legally wound up and dissolved. The order shall declare that the

corporation has been legally wound up, that any tax or penalty due under AS

10.06.805

—

10.06.870

has been paid or secured and that the other known debts and liabilities of the corporation have been paid or adequately provided for, or that taxes, penalties, debts, and liabilities have been paid as far as its assets permit; if adequate provision has been made for the payment of all known debts or liabilities, the order shall state what provision has been made, setting out the name and address of the corporation, person, or governmental agency that has assumed or guaranteed the payment, or the name and address of the depositary with which deposit has been made or other information as may be necessary to enable the creditor or other person to whom payment is to be made to appear and claim payment of the debt or liability;

known assets of the corporation have been distributed to the persons entitled to the assets or that it acquired no known assets;

accounts of directors or other persons appointed under AS

10.06.648

have been settled and that they are discharged from their duties and liabilities to creditors and shareholders;

corporation is dissolved.

The court may make additional orders and grant further relief as it considers proper upon the evidence submitted.

Upon the making of the order declaring the corporation dissolved, corporate existence ceases except for the purposes of further winding up if needed. The directors or other persons appointed under AS

10.06.648

shall be discharged from their duties and liabilities, except as needed to complete the winding up.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.658.
Filing of decree of dissolution.

The clerk of the court shall file with the commissioner a certified copy of a court decree dissolving a corporation. A fee may not be charged for the filing of a decree of dissolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 73, see sec. 29, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.